North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 4. Competitive Service.

§ 126-12.
Governor and Council of State to determine competitive service.

The Governor, with the approval of the Council of State, shall from time to time determine for which, if any of the positions subject to the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter, appointments and promotions shall be based on a competitive system of selection.

History.

1965, c. 640, s. 2.